New York, session 2025-2026, S7016.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 2 of section 367-w of the 2 social services law, as added by section 1 of part ZZ of chapter 56 of 3 the laws of 2022, is amended to read as follows: 4 (a) "Employee" means certain front line health care and mental hygiene 5 practitioners, technicians, assistants and aides that provide hands on 6 health or care services to individuals, without regard to whether the 7 person works full-time, part-time, on a salaried, hourly, or temporary 8 basis, or as an independent contractor, that received an annualized base 9 salary of one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars or less, to include: 10 (i) [Physician] physician assistants, dental hygienists, dental 11 assistants, psychiatric aides, pharmacists, pharmacy technicians, phys- 12 ical therapists, physical therapy assistants, physical therapy aides, 13 occupational therapists, occupational therapy assistants, occupational 14 therapy aides, speech-language pathologists, respiratory therapists, 15 exercise physiologists, recreational therapists, all other therapists, 16 orthotists, prosthetists, clinical laboratory technologists and techni- 17 cians, diagnostic medical sonographers, nuclear medicine technologists, 18 radiologic technologists, magnetic resonance imaging technologists, 19 ophthalmic medical technicians, radiation therapists, dietetic techni- 20 cians, cardiovascular technologists and technicians, certified first 21 responders, emergency medical technicians, advanced emergency medical 22 technicians, paramedics, surgical technologists, all other health tech- 23 nologists and technicians, orderlies, medical assistants, phlebotomists, 24 all other health care support workers, nurse anesthetists, nurse EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04731-01-5 S. 7016 2 1 midwives, nurse practitioners, registered nurses, nursing assistants, 2 and licensed practical and licensed vocational nurses; 3 (ii) to the extent not already included in subparagraph (i) of this 4 paragraph, staff who perform functions as described in the consolidated 5 fiscal report (CFR) manual with respect to the following title codes: 6 Mental Hygiene Worker; 7 Residence/Site Worker; 8 Counselor (OMH); 9 Manager (OMH); 10 Senior Counselor (OMH); 11 Supervisor (OMH); 12 Developmental Disabilities Specialist QIDP - Direct Care (OPWDD); 13 Certified Recovery Peer Advocate; 14 Peer Professional - Non-CRPA (OASAS Only); 15 Job Coach/Employment Specialist (OMH and OPWDD); 16 Peer Specialist (OMH); 17 Counselor - Alcoholism and Substance Abuse (CASAC); 18 Counseling Aide/Assistant - Alcoholism and Substance Abuse; 19 Other Direct Care Staff; 20 Case Manager; 21 Counselor - Rehabilitation; 22 Developmental Disabilities Specialist/Habilitation Specialist QIDP - 23 Clinical (OPWDD); 24 Emergency Medical Technician; 25 Intensive Case Manager (OMH); 26 Intensive Case Manager/Coordinator (OMH); 27 Nurse - Licensed Practical; 28 Nurse - Registered; 29 Psychologist (Licensed); 30 Psychologist (Master's Level)/Behavioral Specialist; 31 Psychology Worker/Other Behavioral Worker; 32 Social Worker - Licensed (LMSW, LCSW); 33 Social Worker - Master's Level (MSW); 34 Licensed Mental Health Counselor (OASAS, OMH, OCFS); 35 Licensed Psychoanalyst (OMH); 36 Therapist - Recreation; 37 Therapist - Activity/Creative Arts; 38 Therapist - Occupational; 39 Dietician/Nutritionist; 40 Therapy Assistant/Activity Assistant; 41 Nurse's Aide/Medical Aide; 42 Behavior Intervention Specialist 1 (OPWDD); 43 Behavior Intervention Specialist 2 (OPWDD); 44 Clinical Coordinator; 45 Intake/Screening; 46 Pharmacist; 47 Marriage and Family Counselor/Therapist; 48 Residential Treatment Facility (RTF) Transition Coordinator (OMH); 49 Crisis Prevention Specialist (OMH); 50 Early Recognition Specialist (OMH); 51 Other Clinical Staff/Assistants; 52 Nurse Practitioner/Nursing Supervisor; 53 Therapist - Physical; 54 Therapist - Speech; 55 Program or Site Director; and 56 Assistant Program or Assistant Site Director; [and] S. 7016 3 1 (iii) any parent or parent of a minor who cares for such minor child 2 with an intellectual or developmental disability; and 3 (iv) such titles as determined by the commissioner, or relevant agency 4 commissioner as applicable, and approved by the director of the budget. 5 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall be deemed to 6 have been in full force and effect on and after April 9, 2022.